Ohio, session 136, SB18.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Ohio: Section 1. That section 5.2540 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 5.2540. The fourteenth day of February is designated as "Cardiovascular Health Awareness Day." Speaker ___________________ of the House of Representatives. President ___________________ of the Senate. Passed ________________________, 20____ Approved ________________________, 20____ Governor. The section numbering of law of a general and permanent nature is complete and in conformity with the Revised Code. Director, Legislative Service Commission. Filed in the office of the Secretary of State at Columbus, Ohio, on the ____ day of ___________, A. D. 20____. Secretary of State. File No. _________	Effective Date ___________________